Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 286A.035 is amended to read:
286A.035. (1) Each related agency shall report the plans of  the related agency for the issuance
of bonds during the next biennium. The related agency shall submit the related  agency’s report to
the Governor by a date determined by the Governor and shall include in the  report a description
of bonds that the related agency intends to retire or defease during the next biennium.
(2) On or before a date determined  by the Governor, the State Treasurer shall advise the Gov-
ernor on the prudent maximum amount of bonds to be issued  for each bond program. The State
Treasurer shall consider available  economic and financial data in preparing advice to be given to
the Governor.
(3) As part of the Governor’s budget described in ORS 291.216, the Governor shall:
(a) Consider the prudent maximum amounts advised by the State  Treasurer pursuant to sub-
section (2) of this section to determine the Governor’s total recommended amount; and
(b) Recommend to the Legislative Assembly the total amount of bonds the State Treasurer  may
issue for each bond program for a biennium.
(4) The Legislative Assembly shall determine  the amount of bonds the State Treasurer may issue
for each state agency for a biennium. Except as  provided in subsection (5) of this section,  if the
Legislative Assembly fails to make the determination described in this subsection  by the first day
of the biennium, the unused portion of the authorization the Legislative  Assembly made for the
preceding biennium is deemed to carry forward for the current biennium at  the amount authorized
for the preceding biennium until the earlier of:
(a) The date on which legislation authorizing the amount of bonds for  the current biennium is
enacted; or
(b) The date on which the Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
(5) The unused portion of the amount of pass-through revenue bonds  authorized for is-
suance in the preceding biennium is deemed to  carry forward for the current biennium until
the date on which legislation authorizing the amount of pass-through revenue bonds  for the
current biennium is enacted.
Enrolled Senate Bill 225 (SB 225-A) Page 1
[(5)] (6)  The amount of bonds that may be issued  under bond programs may be modified by the
Governor. However, the Governor may not modify the amount of bonds that may be issued  under
bond programs in a way that would cause the maximum amount established by the Legislative  As-
sembly for a category of bond programs to be exceeded if the Legislative Assembly:
(a) Has categorized  the bonds that may be issued under bond programs as general obligation,
direct revenue and pass-through revenue bonds; and
(b) Assigned a maximum amount to each category.
[(6)] (7) This section applies to bonds:
(a) Unless the bonds are expressly exempted from the requirements of this section.
(b) Except refunding bonds.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 286A.615 is amended to read:
286A.615. (1) The Private Activity Bond Committee  is established. It shall consist of the State
Treasurer or the designee  of the State Treasurer, one representative from the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services and one public representative appointed to serve at the pleasure  of the
Governor.
(2) The State Treasurer, or  the State Treasurer’s designee, shall serve as chair of the committee.
(3) The  purpose of private activity bonding in this state is to maximize the economic benefits
of private activity  bonding to the citizens of this state. The committee shall adopt by rule standards
for amounts allocated to  the committee for further allocation for economic development, housing,
education,  redevelopment,  public works, energy, waste management, waste and recycling collection,
transportation and other activities  that the committee determines will benefit the citizens of this
state. In developing standards, the committee shall:
(a) Survey the expected need for private activity bond allocations at least once each year;
(b) Develop  strategies for reserving and allocating the limit that are designed to maximize the
availability of tax exempt financing among competing sectors of the Oregon economy; and
(c) Ensure that the standards include but are not limited to standards that:
(A) Support projects that increase the number of family wage jobs in this state.
(B) Promote economic recovery in small cities heavily dependent on a single industry.
(C) Emphasize development in underdeveloped rural areas of this state.
(D) Utilize educational resources available at public universities listed in ORS 352.002.
(E) Support development of  the state’s small businesses, especially minority-owned businesses,
woman-owned businesses, businesses that service-disabled veterans own and emerging small  busi-
nesses, as those terms are defined in ORS 200.005.
(F) Encourage use of Oregon’s human and natural resources in endeavors that harness Oregon’s
economic comparative advantages.
(4) The state private activity bond volume cap  allocated to the Private Activity Bond Committee
as provided in ORS 286A.620 shall be allocated and reallocated among issuers by the  Private Ac-
tivity Bond Committee as follows:
(a) Any amounts not reserved to an issuer  or a class of issuers under the authorization adopted
by the Legislative Assembly  under ORS 286A.035 shall be allocated or reallocated by the committee
under rules adopted under subsection (3) of this section.
(b) Any amounts provided for in the authorization adopted by the Legislative Assembly under
ORS 286A.035 that are unused shall be carried forward for use  as provided by rules adopted under
subsection (3) of this section.
(c) The rules adopted by the  committee shall limit the period of time for which an allocation
of private activity  bonding authority is effective. The rules shall ensure that allocations made during
a calendar year are used  during that calendar year or that the unused amount of the allocation is
reallocated or carried forward.
[(5) Unused allocations are not transferable among issuers but are available for reallocation. ]
(5) Amounts allocated  to a state agency on behalf of which the State Treasurer may issue
bonds may be  suballocated by the state agency, at the state agency’s discretion, through an
Enrolled Senate Bill 225 (SB 225-A) Page 2
assignment of the allocation to another issuer, provided that the issuer receiving the as-
signment shall:
(a) Use the allocation for the same category  of private activity bond projects for which
the allocation was made;
(b) Use the allocation during the calendar year for which the allocation was made; and
(c) Otherwise comply with any terms and conditions imposed in connection with  the al-
location by the committee or the Legislative Assembly or by rule of the state  agency making
the assignment.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 286A.118 is amended to read:
286A.118. With the approval of the  State Treasurer, a related agency may lend moneys derived
from an issuance and sale of bonds to a [ conduit] pass-through revenue bond borrower of proceeds
from outstanding,  previously issued [ conduit] pass-through  revenue bonds for the purpose of paying
a termination payment due under an agreement for exchange  of interest rates entered into by the
[conduit] pass-through revenue bond  borrower in relation to  the outstanding, previously issued
[conduit] pass-through  revenue bonds.
SECTION 4.  ORS 286A.130 is amended to read:
286A.130. (1) The State Treasurer or a related agency may enter into one or more  agreements
for bond counsel  services for a period of not less than one year during any biennium in which there
are bonds outstanding that were issued for the state agency  or during any biennium in which the
state agency expects the State Treasurer to issue bonds for an agency program. A  state agency may
not enter into an agreement for bond counsel services unless the State Treasurer and the  Attorney
General have reviewed and approved the terms and conditions of the agreement. Before  approving
an agreement,  the State Treasurer shall consider the reputation, experience and credentials of the
bond counsel, including the individuals expected to actually fulfill the contract work.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the  appointment of bond counsel may
not be construed as  authorizing bond counsel to advise or represent the state on matters that are
committed by statute to the Attorney General.
(3) The services provided under a bond counsel agreement may include:
(a) Advising a state agency or the  State Treasurer concerning the legality of specific proposed
taxable or tax-exempt bonds and the compliance of obligations with applicable  law, including but
not limited to federal securities and tax laws;
(b) Issuing opinions to a state agency, the State Treasurer or other parties concerning  the
enforceability of, authority for and tax status of bonds,  agreements for exchange of interest rates,
credit enhancement devices  or similar associated documents and on the lawful use of the proceeds
of the bonds, as may be required by the demands of the marketplace for the bonds;
(c) Advising a state agency  or the State Treasurer on legal procedures and practices in the bond
marketplace, including advice on the structuring and sale of bonds;
(d) Preparing or  assisting in the preparation of documents related to a specific issue of bonds,
including but not limited to an  authorizing resolution or declaration, a trust indenture, a prospectus,
a preliminary official statement, an official statement, a bond sale notice, a bond form, a bid form,
a bond purchase agreement, an agreement for exchange  of interest rates, a credit enhancement de-
vice or a similar document necessary or desirable to sell bonds;
(e) Advising a state agency or the State Treasurer concerning the maintenance  of the tax status
of specific bonds, compliance with any requirements for representations  or disclosures relating to
the bonds, compliance with any documents executed as part of the issuance of  the bonds and federal
laws related to bond programs that may be available to a state agency;
(f) Advising a state agency or the State Treasurer concerning accounting, investment  or ad-
ministrative procedures recommended or required for compliance with federal or state securities  or
tax or rebate requirements relating to  bonds that were issued for the agency or that the agency
expects to issue; and
(g) Advising and assisting a state agency or the State Treasurer in responding to  an inquiry
received from or an audit by a federal or state regulatory body concerning:
Enrolled Senate Bill 225 (SB 225-A) Page 3
(A) The tax status of interest paid on the bonds;
(B) The marketing of the bonds;
(C) Requirements of federal law  related to the use of bond proceeds or the program for which
the bonds were issued; or
(D) Other matters within the jurisdiction of the federal or state regulatory body relating  to
bonds that were issued by the state agency.
(4) In addition to entering into an agreement described in subsection (3) of this section, the State
Treasurer or a related agency may appoint bond counsel  by letter, certificate or otherwise, to pro-
vide the  services described in subsection (3) of this section for an individual [ conduit] pass-through
revenue bond sale.
(5) The State Treasurer  or, with the approval of the State Treasurer, a related agency may enter
into an agreement with and retain the services of one or more providers of financial advisory  ser-
vices.  When  considering whether to enter into or approve an agreement with a provider of financial
advisory services, before approving the agreement, the State Treasurer  shall consider the reputa-
tion, experience and credentials of the adviser, including the individuals expected to  actually fulfill
the contract work.
(6) Except  for the expenses of bond counsel services provided under subsection (4) of this section
for [ conduit] pass-through  revenue bond sales, the related agency shall pay the expenses of  any
agreements entered into under this section and may use bond proceeds to pay those expenses.
(7) The Public Contracting Code does not apply to agreements entered into under this section.
SECTION 5.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate April 13, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 25, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 225 (SB 225-A) Page 4